New York, session 2025-2026, S6503.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (g) of section 19.09 of the mental hygiene law, 2 as amended by chapter 271 of the laws of 2010, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (g) (1) The commissioner shall establish and operate chemical depend- 5 ence programs, facilities, and services for the prevention, treatment, 6 and rehabilitation, including relapse prevention and recovery mainte- 7 nance, of persons who abuse or are dependent on alcohol and/or 8 substances, and significant others not limited to the psychiatric model 9 but embodying all recognized or promising approaches. 10 (2) In cities with a population of one million or more, the commis- 11 sioner shall collect data on the number of facilities sited and operat- 12 ing within each jurisdiction of each community board. Such data shall be 13 made available on the office's website, updated as needed to maintain an 14 accurate dataset, and considered in the course of the approval of the 15 establishment, incorporation and certification of providers of substance 16 use disorder services. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10944-01-5